Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5193.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-28.2 of the General Laws entitled "Office of State Fire Marshal"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-28.2-31. Electric and hybrid motor vehicle identification database.
(a) The office of the state fire marshal ("office") shall, in coordination with the division of
motor vehicles ("division"), create and maintain a vehicle identification database for electric or
hybrid motor vehicles powered in whole or in part by a high-voltage lithium-ion storage battery.
(b) The office shall compile a contact list of all departments and districts that provide fire-
fighting services and shall provide the division with the list which would enable the division to
transfer the information required to be collected pursuant to subsection (c) of this section directly
to the fire department or fire district that provides fire protection services to the address of the
vehicle owner. The office shall provide an updated contact list to the division as necessary.
(c) The information to be transferred by the division pursuant to this section shall be limited
to:
(1) The vehicle registration information;
(2) A vehicle description including the make, model and year of the vehicle; and
(3) The address of the structure where the vehicle is located.
(d) The division shall forward the information collected pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section to the municipal or volunteer fire department or fire district that provides fire protection
services where the vehicle is located by January 1, and July 1, of each year.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC000848/SUB A/3
========
LC000848/SUB A/3 - Page 2 of 3